test/src/morphology/V-naeaeqdw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - nǟ’dõ: # Verb 4 'eng /est näha/fin' - full paradigm
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Inf: nǟ’dõ
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Ger: nǟ’dsõ
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Sup: nǟmõ
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Sup+Ine: nǟmõs
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Sup+Ela: nǟmõst
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Sup+Tra: nǟmõks
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Sup+Abe: nǟmõt
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nǟb
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: nǟtõ
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nǟbõd
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: neiz
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: neiztõ
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: neiztõ
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: nǟ
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Cond+Sg3: nǟks
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: nǟ
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: nǟ
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: nǟgid
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+Jus+Sg3: nǟgõ
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+QuoSg3: nēji
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+ActPrfPrc: nǟnd
      nǟ’dõ+V+TV+PssPrfPrc: nǟ’dõd
